Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB401.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Findings and declarations.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) The eastern box turtle can be found across this Commonwealth in rural, suburban and even urban habitats in shrubby grasslands, marshy meadows, open woodlands and field forest edges.(2) The eastern box turtle is often found near streams or ponds or areas that have experienced heavy rainfall.(3) The eastern box turtle generally lives for 25 to 35 years but has been known to survive for more than 100 years.(4) The eastern box turtle has many unique identifying characteristics, including:(i) When in danger, the eastern box turtle can close the hinged sections of its shell, effectively sealing its 12345678910111213141516171819 soft body in bone, forming a "box."(ii) When injured or damaged, the eastern box turtle's shell has the capacity to regenerate and reform.(5) Unfortunately, the eastern box turtle is becoming an at-risk species, experiencing population declines throughout most of its range due to habitat fragmentation, roadway traffic and ATV use, incidental and illegal collection, poor habitat management activities, inflated level of predation, disease and natural disturbances such as floods and fires.(6) Designation as the official State reptile will assist in conservation efforts for the eastern box turtle and other turtle, snake and lizard species.Section 2. Official State reptile.The eastern box turtle (Terrapene carolina carolina) is designated as the official State reptile of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania.Section 3. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0401PN0370 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718